Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1295.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4552 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4552. General requirements for school buses.* * *(b.4) Extended stop signal arms.--(1) A school bus may be equipped with an extension to a side stop signal arm that partially obstructs the roadway. A maximum of two extensions to a side stop signal arm may be equipped on the left side of the vehicle.(2) An extension to a side stop signal arm shall comply with the following specifications:(i) The extension shall be equipped with a system of flashing red lights.12345678910111213141516171819 (ii) The front side of the extension shall extend no more than 78 inches, measured from the left side of the vehicle to the furthest part of the extension to the side stop signal arm, and at a height no less than 36 inches from the ground.(iii) The rear side of the extension shall extend no more than 32 inches, measured from the left side of the vehicle to the furthest part of the extension to the side stop signal arm, and at a height no less than 36 inches from the ground.(3) The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this subsection.* * *Section 2. Section 4921(e.1) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 4921. Width of vehicles.* * *(e.1) School buses.--School bus side stop signal arms and extended stop signal arms, as provided for in section 4552 (relating to general requirements for school buses), may, when in an extended position displaying red visual signals while the vehicle is stopped and loading or discharging students, extend beyond the width limitation otherwise provided in this section.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1295PN1491 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324